Illinois, session 104th, HB863.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Gubernatorial Boards and Commissions Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (15 ILCS 50/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Gubernatorial Boards and Commissions Act. 9(Source: P.A. 96-543, eff. 8-17-09.)